Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the official adoption of "the evergreen state" as the state nickname will be the final chapter to formalize a nickname long associated with our beautiful state. This nickname has been long circulated by word of mouth, storytelling, and license plate display. The reference to freshness is supported by foliage that remains green and functional past just one growing season.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:"The evergreen state" is hereby designated as the official nickname of the state of Washington.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed as creating a requirement for any entity to update or revise any existing materials, documents, or publications.--- END ---